Utah statutes.
23-13-7.   Use of fireworks and explosives by division employees and certain
federal game agents.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, employees of the Division of
Wildlife Resources and federal game agents charged with the duty of managing
wildlife resources may, without obtaining a permit, use fireworks and
explosives to rally, drive, or otherwise disperse concentrations of wildlife
as may be necessary to protect property or wildlife resources.
